Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 6 SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS
32-11-663. Sewer acquisitions.

Sewers and other drainage facilities shall be established and constructed at such time and in such locations, to such extent, with such dimensions and materials, and in accordance with such full details and specifications as may be prescribed by the board. Whenever necessary, land rights-of-way for any sewer or other drainage facility ordered by the board may be purchased, condemned, or otherwise acquired on behalf of the improvement district and the cost charged to such district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 807, § 176.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-176.

32-11-664. Classification of sewer districts.

The board may order by resolution:

The acquisition of improvement district sewers, other drainage facilities, and appurtenances for storm drainage, to be known as sewer districts; and

The acquisition of relief sewers or other drainage facilities or intercepting sewers or other drainage facilities and appurtenances for storm drainage for districts, to be known as relief districts or as intercepting districts.

Such sewers shall be constructed so as to connect within or without the improvement district with some other sufficient sewer or disposal facilities or with some natural drainage. Such districts may be composed of subdistricts to be specifically named or numbered in such resolution.

District sewers, except as provided in this article, shall include all submains necessary to provide outlets for all subdistrict laterals within the improvement district.

Special district sewers shall include the necessary mains to provide outlets for all laterals within the special sewer district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 807, § 177.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-177.

32-11-665. Acquisition of subdistrict laterals.

The board may at the time of ordering the acquisition of district sewers or at any time thereafter order the acquisition of subdistrict laterals in any such subdistrict so as to connect the same with the submains or with the district main sewer, the same to be approved by resolution as in the case of district sewers.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 808, § 178.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-178.

32-11-666. Assessment of district sewers.

The cost of district sewers may be assessed upon all the assessable property in the improvement district, in proportion to the special benefits derived to each of the several tracts comprising the assessable property and on a front-foot, area, zone, or other equitable basis. The cost of subdistrict laterals shall be assessed in like manner upon all the assessable property in the subdistrict.

The acquisition, however, of any submain may be omitted until such time as it may be required, in which case subdistricts so left without submains shall not be assessed for any part of the cost of submains acquired along, with, and as a part of the sewer district.

Whenever submains so omitted are required and are constructed, they may be ordered as provided for other sewers, and their cost shall be assessed to the subdistricts which are supplied with submains.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 808, § 179.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-179.

32-11-667. Issuance of refunding bonds.

Any assessment bonds issued under this article may be refunded pursuant to resolution to be adopted by the board in the manner provided in this article for the issuance of other assessment bonds. Refunding bonds so issued may be secured in such manner and may be made payable from such sources as provided in the resolution authorizing their issuance.

The security for the payment of the refunding bonds may be greater or lesser than the security for the payment of the bonds refunded. Bonds pertaining to more than one improvement district may be refunded by the bonds of one series. Such refunding bonds may be payable from the unpaid assessments of such improvement districts, and such payment may be additionally secured in accordance with sections 32-11-628 and 32-11-629 and other provisions in this article supplemental thereto.

Refunding bonds so issued may be sold at public or at private sale or may be exchanged dollar for dollar for the bonds to be refunded.

If sold, the proceeds of sale may be escrowed for the payment of the bonds to be refunded in such manner as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the refunding bonds and in sections 32-11-564 to 32-11-568 and section 32-11-570 for other refunding bonds of the urban district constituting special obligations.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 808, § 180.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-180.

32-11-668. Reassessments.

Whenever any assessment for any project under this article, in the opinion of the board, is invalid by reason of any irregularity or informality in the proceedings, or if any court of competent jurisdiction adjudges such assessments to be illegal, the board, whether the project has been effected or not or whether any parts of the assessments have been paid or not, has power to cause a new assessment to be made for the same purpose for which the former assessment was made.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 809, § 181.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-181.

32-11-669. Procedure for relevy.

When an assessment is so determined to be invalid or illegal, the board shall by resolution order and shall make a new assessment or reassessment upon the tracts which have been or will be benefited by the project to which the invalid assessment pertains, to the extent of their proportionate part of the expense thereof, and in case the cost exceeds the actual value of such project, the new assessment or reassessment shall be for and shall be based upon the actual value of the same at the time of the project's completion.

To this end the engineer shall make a new assessment roll in an equitable manner with reference to the benefits received, as near as may be in accordance with the law in force at the time such reassessment is made.

When the new roll has been confirmed and approved by the board as provided for the original assessments, the reassessment shall be enforced and collected in the same manner that other assessments for such project are enforced and collected, under the provisions in sections 32-11-635 to 32-11-661.

No proceedings relative to making the cost of any project chargeable upon property benefited thereby, required, and provided by the laws of the urban district prior to the making of the original assessment roll, shall be included or required within the purpose of sections 32-11-668 to 32-11-679.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 809, § 182.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-182.

32-11-670. Resolution for reassessment.

The board of the urban district shall by resolution order and make a new assessment or reassessment, as provided in section 32-11-669, upon the tracts which have been or will be benefited by such project to the extent of their proportionate part of the cost of the project.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 809, § 183.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-183.

32-11-671. Assessment roll - certification.

Upon the passage of a resolution, as provided in this article, the engineer shall make out an assessment roll according to the provisions of the resolution and shall certify the same to the board, as provided in section 32-11-636.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 809, § 184.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-184.

32-11-672. Notice of filing.

Upon receiving the assessment roll, the secretary shall give notice of an assessment hearing, as provided in section 32-11-637.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 809, § 185.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-185.

32-11-673. Hearing.

At the time and place appointed for hearing, the board shall hold an assessment hearing and shall otherwise proceed, as provided in section 32-11-638.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 809, § 186.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-186.

32-11-674. Levy of reassessment - cost and value.

The fact that the contract has been let or that such project has been acquired or improved, or acquired and improved, and otherwise completed in whole or in part shall not prevent such assessment from being made, nor shall the omission, failure, or neglect of any officer to comply with the provisions of the laws governing the urban district as to petition, notice, resolution to acquire or improve, or both acquire and improve, estimate, survey, diagram, manner of letting contract or execution of work, or any other matter whatsoever connected with the project and the first assessment thereof operate to invalidate or in any way to affect the making of the new assessment or reassessment, as provided for by sections 32-11-668 to 32-11-679, charging the property benefited with the expense thereof, except as otherwise provided in this article.

Any such reassessment shall be levied by resolution, shall become final, and shall be subject to appeal as provided in sections 32-11-639 and 32-11-640.

Such reassessment shall be for an amount which shall not exceed the actual cost and value of the project, together with any interest that has lawfully accrued thereon; and such amount shall be equitably apportioned upon the tracts benefited thereby according to the provisions of the laws of the urban district.

It is the true intent and meaning of sections 32-11-668 to 32-11-679 to make the cost and expense of each local improvement project payable by the tracts benefited by such project by making a reassessment therefor, notwithstanding that the proceedings of the board, engineer, or other body or any officers thereof may be found irregular or defective, whether jurisdictional or otherwise.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 809, § 187.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-187.

32-11-675. Credits for prior assessment.

Whenever any sum or any part thereof levied upon any tract in the assessment so set aside has been paid and not refunded, the payment so made shall be applied upon the reassessment of the tract on account of which the same was paid.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 810, § 188.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-188.

32-11-676. Collection of assessments - new warrant or order.

In all cases where the county treasurer or other district and county authorities are unable to enforce the collection of any assessment by reason of irregularity or omission in any proceedings subsequent to the confirmation of the assessment, the board is authorized to cause a new warrant or order to issue to the county treasurer or other proper officer for the collection of any assessment which by reason of such irregularity or omission remains unpaid and not collected.

The county treasurer or other proper officer shall proceed under such new warrant or order to enforce and to collect the assessments therein specified in the same manner, as near as may be, as is prescribed by the provisions of sections 32-11-642 to 32-11-651, for the enforcement and the collection of assessments, after the same have been confirmed and reassessed, as provided in sections 32-11-668 to 32-11-679.

As often as any failure occurs by reason of such irregularities or omissions, a new warrant or order may issue, and new proceedings shall be had in like manner until such assessment is fully collected as to each tract charged therewith.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 810, § 189.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-189.

32-11-677. Appeal to district court.

Any person who has filed objections to such new assessment or reassessment, as provided in this article, has the right to appeal to the district court of this state in and for the county and district in which the tract assessed is situated, as provided and subject to the limitations in section 32-11-640.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 810, § 190.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-190.

32-11-678. Procedure exclusive.

The rights and remedies given in this article to the taxpayer and the property owner for objecting to, contesting, or appealing from the amount, correctness, regularity, or validity of such new assessment or reassessment are declared to be exclusive of all other rights, remedies, suits, or actions either at law or in equity which might otherwise be available, to afford him a sufficient day in court for the redressing of all rights and grievances that he may have in connection with such new assessment or reassessment.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 811, § 191.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-191.

32-11-679. Application of reassessment funds.

Whenever the urban district issues assessment debentures or assessment bonds to obtain funds to pay for any project which has been actually acquired or improved, or both acquired and improved, and the assessments levied therefor fail to be valid or sufficient in whole or in part and a new assessment or reassessment has been levied and confirmed, as provided in sections 32-11-668 to 32-11-679, then the urban district is directed to apply all moneys derived from such assessments, new assessments, and reassessments to the payment of such assessment securities according to their tenor. The securities issued for any project actually acquired or improved, or both acquired and improved, shall be valid and binding obligations of the district, payable out of such assessments, new assessments, and reassessments, which shall be levied and relevied until payment in full has been made, as provided in section 32-11-624.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 811, § 192.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-192.